Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 130.50 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known as the “United States


Semiquincentennial Celebration Taxpayer Relief Act”.



Req. No. 3048 Page 1


B. The Legislature finds that this state has obligated but


unexpended funds from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021


Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery Funds, totaling


approximately Seven Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($750,000,000.00).


In celebration of the United States Semiquincentennial, the two


hundred fiftieth anniversary of American independence, and as a


gesture of gratitude to Oklahoma taxpayers for their resilience


through challenging times, these funds shall be reclassified to


revenue replacement under 31 C.F.R., Part 35, Subpart A, to offset


existing state obligations. This will free equivalent state general


revenue for a one-time taxpayer relief program, ensuring federal


compliance while providing direct relief.


C. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services, in


consultation with the State Treasurer, is authorized to reclassify


up to Seven Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($750,000,000.00) of


obligated but unexpended Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery


Funds to revenue replacement provisions. Eligible uses include, but


shall not be limited to:


1. Offsetting personnel and operational costs for government


services;


2. Support for behavioral health and developmental services;


3. Replenishment of trust funds impacted by pandemic demands;


and



Req. No. 3048 Page 2


4. Other provision of government services as defined by United


States Department of the Treasury guidance, to the extent of


calculated pandemic-related revenue loss.


D. Reclassifications shall prioritize substitution for fiscal


year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 general fund appropriations, freeing


up equivalent state revenues. No funds shall be used for new


initiatives beyond existing obligations. The Office of Management


and Enterprise Services shall submit a report to the Legislature and


United States Department of the Treasury by March 31, 2026,


detailing reclassifications and compliance.


E. There is hereby created the United States Semiquincentennial


Taxpayer Relief Program, to be administered by the Oklahoma Tax


Commission, providing direct relief and celebrating the nation’s two


hundred fiftieth anniversary and Oklahoma’s strength and future.


F. Using state general revenues pursuant to subsection C of


this section, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall issue a one-time


rebate of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per taxpayer. Rebates


shall be issued via direct deposit using tax return information or


mailed check, commencing no later than June 30, 2026. Persons


eligible to receive rebates as outlined in this section shall be:


1. Oklahoma residents who filed an individual income tax return


for tax year 2024 or 2025; or





Req. No. 3048 Page 3


2. Oklahoma residents who filed joint income tax returns for


tax year 2024 or 2025, who shall be eligible to receive a one-time


rebate of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).


Nonresidents, dependents claimed on another’s return, or


individuals with no tax liability shall be ineligible to receive


rebates as provided in this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 131.51 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Tax Commission from


any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund


of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the


sum of Six Hundred Million Dollars ($600,000,000.00) or so much


thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the


Tax Commission by law.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 130.52 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Joint Committee on Appropriations and Budget for the Senate


and the House of Representatives shall jointly oversee the


implementation of this act, with authority to audit


reclassifications and rebates.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 3048 Page 4


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3048 BRC 1/12/2026 4:26:33 PM









































Req. No. 3048 Page 5